public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<pardef n="lu/cir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ciríamos</l>  <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciría</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciríais</l>   <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cirías</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cirían</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciría</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciremos</l>   <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciré</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciréis</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cirás</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cirán</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cirá</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciéremos</l>  <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciere</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciereis</l>   <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cieres</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cieren</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciere</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciendo</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciéndo</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cimos</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cí</l>        <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cisteis</l>   <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciste</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieron</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ció</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcamos</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcámo</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcámos</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cid</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cid</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantad' was replaced --><par n="S__haz"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cí</l>        <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__oí"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cíd</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantád' was replaced --><par n="S__ház"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcan</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zca</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cir</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cir</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cír</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantár"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cíamos</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cía</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cíais</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cías</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cían</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cía</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciéramos</l>  <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciésemos</l>  <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciera</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciese</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cierais</l>   <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cieseis</l>   <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieras</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cieses</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieran</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciesen</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciera</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciese</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cidas</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cida</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cidos</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cido</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cimos</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zco</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cís</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cen</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcamos</l>    <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zca</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcáis</l>     <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcas</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcan</l>      <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zca</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lú/cir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cánta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcan</l>       <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zca</l>        <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="enlucir" a="prompsit"><i>enlu</i><par n="lu/cir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lucir">           <i>lu</i><par n="lu/cir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deslucir">        <i>deslu</i><par n="lu/cir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="traslucir">       <i>traslu</i><par n="lu/cir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="traslucir" r="LR"><p><l>translu</l>        <r>traslu</r></p><par n="lu/cir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="relucir">         <i>relu</i><par n="lu/cir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="translucir" a="GVA"><i>translu</i><par n="lu/cir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="translucir" a="GVA"><p><l>translú</l><r>translu</r></p><par n="lú/cir__vblex"/></e>
